Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201919-930
Interjurisdictional planning commission; assume powers and duties of planning commission; when.

(1) For any matter within the jurisdiction of a planning commission of a city of the first class, city of the second class, or village relating to that portion of the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of the city or village as defined in section 16-901 or 17-1001 which is within a county other than the county in which the city or village is located, the powers, duties, responsibilities, and functions of the planning commission of the city or village with regard to such matter shall be assumed by the interjurisdictional planning commission of the city or village established under section 19-931 when the formation of such a commission is requested by either the city or village or the county within which the city or village is not located as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Any city or village exercising extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction as defined in section 16-901 or 17-1001 within a county other than the county within which the city or village is located or the county within which such city or village is exercising extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction may, by formal resolution of a majority of the voting members of the city council, village board of trustees, or county board, request the formation of an interjurisdictional planning commission to exercise the jurisdiction granted by sections 19-930 to 19-933. Such resolution shall be transmitted to the appropriate city or village or county and its receipt formally acknowledged.

Laws 1993, LB 207, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 96.
September 1, 2019